Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.060

Loans and exchanges of codes and supplements.

The committee may loan sets of the code and materials supplemental thereto

(1) for the use of senate committees, a quantity as required by advice from the secretary of the senate, not to exceed twenty-five sets;

(2) for use of the house committees, a quantity as required by advice from the chief clerk of the house, not to exceed thirty-five sets;

(3) to the state law library for library use;

(4) for use of the reviser's office, as required;

(5) for use of recognized news reporting services maintaining permanent offices at the capitol, three sets.

The committee may exchange copies of RCW for codes or compilations of other states.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 6; 1953 c 257 s 10.]